North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-04 Motor Vehicle Registration
39-04-19.
Motor vehicle registration fees and mile tax.

Motor vehicles required to pay registration fees or a mile tax shall pay the following fees:

Nonresidents electing to pay mile tax in lieu of registration, when authorized to do so by the department, shall pay a fee of twenty dollars for a trip permit which is valid for a period of seventy-two hours. All fees collected under the provisions of this subsection must be credited to the state highway fund.

Motor vehicles required to be registered in this state must be furnished license plates upon the payment of the following annual fees; however, if a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle or trailer, first becomes subject to registration other than at the beginning of the registration period, such fees must be prorated on a monthly basis. The minimum fee charged hereunder must be five dollars:

Passenger motor vehicles:

Schoolbuses, buses for hire, buses owned and operated by religious, charitable, or nonprofit organizations and used exclusively for religious, charitable, or other public nonprofit purposes, and trucks or combination trucks and trailers, including commercial and noncommercial trucks, except those trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers which qualify for registration under this subsection or subsection 5:

Motorcycles, fifteen dollars.

Motor vehicles acquired by disabled veterans under the provisions of Public Law 79-663 [38 U.S.C. 3901] are exempt from the payment of state sales or use tax and, if paid, such veterans are entitled to a refund. This exemption also applies to any passenger motor vehicle or pickup truck not exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] registered gross weight but shall apply to no more than two such motor vehicles owned by a disabled veteran at any one time.

Each trailer, except a semitrailer or farm trailer, required to be registered under this chapter must be furnished registration plates upon the payment of a twenty dollar annual fee. A trailer, semitrailer, or farm trailer not required to be registered under this chapter must be furnished an identification plate upon the payment of a fee of five dollars.

A semitrailer or farm trailer required to be registered under this chapter must be furnished:

Permanent registration plates upon the payment of a permanent registration fee of one hundred twenty dollars. The permanent registration is valid until ownership of the semitrailer or farm trailer is transferred, assigned, or if the semitrailer is destroyed or otherwise completely removed from the service of the owner; or

Annual registration upon the payment of a twenty dollar annual fee.

Upon the request of a person with a trailer or farm trailer to whom a registration or identification plate is provided under this subsection, the department shall provide a plate of the same size as provided for a motorcycle. The department shall provide notification of this option to the person before the replacement or issuance of the plate.

Trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers weighing more than twenty thousand but not more than one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds [more than 9071.84 but not more than 47854.00 kilograms] which are used as farm vehicles only, are entitled to registration under the following fee schedule and the provisions of this subsection. Farm vehicles are considered, for the purpose of this subsection, as trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers weighing more than twenty thousand but not more than one hundred five thousand five hundred pounds [more than 9071.84 but not more than 47854.00 kilograms] owned, or leased for at least one year by a bona fide resident farmer who uses the vehicles exclusively for transporting the farmer’s own property or other property on a farm work exchange basis with other farmers between farms and the usual local trading places but not in connection with any commercial retail or wholesale business being conducted from those farms, nor otherwise for hire. In addition to the penalty provided in section 39-04-41, any person violating this subsection shall license for the entire license period the farm vehicle at the higher commercial vehicle rate in accordance with the weight carried by the farm vehicle at the time of the violation.

A motor vehicle registered in subsection 5 may be used for custom combining operations by displaying identification issued by the department and upon payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars.

YEARS REGISTERED GrossWeights 1st, 2nd,3rd, 4th, 5th,and 6th Years 7th, 8th,and 9thYears 10th, 11th,and 12thYears 13th andSubsequentYears Less than 3,200 $73 $65 $57 $49 3,200 - 4,499 93 81 69 57 4,500 - 4,999 111 94 79 63 5,000 - 5,999 142 120 98 76 6,000 - 6,999 175 146 117 89 7,000 - 7,999 208 172 137 102 8,000 - 8,999 241 199 157 115 9,000 and over 274 225 177 128

Click to view

A house car is subject to registration at the rates prescribed for other vehicles under this subdivision modified by using the weight applicable to a vehicle whose weight is forty percent of that of the house car, but not using a weight of less than four thousand pounds [1814.35 kilograms].

A pickup truck is subject to registration at the rates prescribed for other vehicles under this subdivision by applying the shipping weight of the vehicle to the fee schedule. At a minimum, the registered gross weight displayed on the registration card for a pickup truck must be twice the shipping weight of the vehicle. Unless otherwise exempted by this chapter, the owner of a pickup truck shall request the registered gross weight of the pickup truck be increased to ensure the registered gross weight is sufficient to include the total weight of the vehicle and any load transported on or by the vehicle. For purposes of this subdivision, a pickup truck is a motor vehicle with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less than eleven thousand five hundred pounds [5216.31 kilograms], with an unladen weight of less than eight thousand pounds [3628.74 kilograms], and which is equipped with an open box-type bed not exceeding nine feet [2.74 meters] in length.

YEARS REGISTERED GrossWeights 1stthrough6th Years 7ththrough9th Years 10ththrough12th Years 13ththrough19thYears 20th andSubsequent Years Not over 4,000 $71 $58 $53 $50 $49 4,001 - 6,000 76 63 57 51 50 6,001 - 8,000 81 68 61 52 51 8,001 - 10,000 86 73 65 54 53 10,001 - 12,000 91 78 69 56 55 12,001 - 14,000 96 83 73 59 58 14,001 - 16,000 101 88 77 62 61 16,001 - 18,000 106 93 81 64 63 18,001 - 20,000 109 96 83 65 64

Click to view

YEARS REGISTERED GrossWeights 1st, 2nd, 3rd,4th, 5th, 6th,and 7th Years 8th, 9th, 10th,11th, and12th Years 13th andSubsequentYears 20,001 - 22,000 $139 $113 $100 22,001 - 26,000 191 161 145 26,001 - 30,000 252 210 188 30,001 - 34,000 318 263 235 34,001 - 38,000 379 312 278 38,001 - 42,000 440 361 320 42,001 - 46,000 501 409 363 46,001 - 50,000 562 458 406 50,001 - 54,000 632 516 457 54,001 - 58,000 693 565 500 58,001 - 62,000 755 614 543 62,001 - 66,000 815 662 586 66,001 - 70,000 876 711 628 70,001 - 74,000 937 760 671 74,001 - 78,000 998 809 714 78,001 - 82,000 1,059 858 757 82,001 - 86,000 1,182 963 844 86,001 - 90,000 1,304 1,067 931 90,001 - 94,000 1,426 1,172 1,018 94,001 - 98,000 1,548 1,277 1,106 98,001 - 102,000 1,670 1,381 1,193 102,001 - 105,500 1,792 1,486 1,280

Click to view

YEARS REGISTERED GrossWeights 1st, 2nd,3rd, 4th, 5th,and 6th Years 7th and8thYears 9th and10thYears 11th andSubsequentYears 20,001 - 22,000 $111 $97 $83 $65 22,001 - 24,000 116 101 86 67 24,001 - 26,000 124 107 90 69 26,001 - 28,000 135 115 96 73 28,001 - 30,000 144 123 102 77 30,001 - 32,000 159 136 113 86 32,001 - 34,000 169 144 119 90 34,001 - 36,000 179 152 125 94 36,001 - 38,000 189 160 131 98 38,001 - 40,000 199 168 137 102 40,001 - 42,000 209 176 143 106 42,001 - 44,000 219 184 149 110 44,001 - 46,000 229 192 155 114 46,001 - 48,000 239 200 161 118 48,001 - 50,000 249 208 167 122 50,001 - 52,000 269 226 183 136 52,001 - 54,000 279 234 189 140 54,001 - 56,000 289 242 195 144 56,001 - 58,000 299 250 201 148 58,001 - 60,000 309 258 207 152 60,001 - 62,000 319 266 213 156 62,001 - 64,000 329 274 219 160 64,001 - 66,000 339 282 225 164 66,001 - 68,000 349 290 231 168 68,001 - 70,000 359 298 237 172 70,001 - 72,000 369 306 243 176 72,001 - 74,000 379 314 249 180 74,001 - 76,000 389 322 255 184 76,001 - 78,000 399 330 261 188 78,001 - 80,000 409 338 267 192 80,001 - 82,000 419 346 273 196 82,001 - 84,000 429 368 316 272 84,001 - 86,000 449 385 330 284 86,001 - 88,000 469 402 344 296 88,001 - 90,000 489 419 358 308 90,001 - 92,000 509 436 372 320 92,001 - 94,000 529 453 386 332 94,001 - 96,000 549 470 400 344 96,001 - 98,000 569 487 414 356 98,001 - 100,000 589 504 428 368 100,001 - 102,000 609 521 442 380 102,001 - 104,000 629 538 456 392 104,001 - 105,500 649 555 470 404

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25; 1931, ch. 186, § 5; 1933, ch. 160, § 8; 1933, ch. 161, § 1; 1933, ch. 162, § 2; 1935, ch. 180, § 1; 1935, ch. 187, § 1; 1941, ch. 194, § 2; R.C. 1943, §§ 39-0422 to 39-0425, 39-0429, 39-0438, 39-0451; S.L. 1945, ch. 248, § 1; 1945, ch. 251, §§ 1, 4; 1947, ch. 267, § 1; 1947, ch. 269, § 1; 1947, ch. 271, § 2; 1951, ch. 243, § 1; 1951, ch. 244, §§ 1, 3; 1953, ch. 237, §§ 4 to 6; 1953, ch. 239, § 1; 1955, ch. 244, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1957, ch. 255, § 1; 1957, ch. 256, § 4; 1957, ch. 257, § 1; 1957 Supp., §§ 39-0422, 39-0424, 39-0425, 39-0429, 39-04312, 39-0451; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1961, ch. 255, § 1; 1963, ch. 265, § 3; 1963, ch. 271, § 1; 1963, ch. 405, § 4; 1967, ch. 301, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 338, § 1; 1971, ch. 357, § 2; 1973, ch. 291, § 2; 1973, ch. 292, § 1; 1973, ch. 293, § 1; 1973, ch. 294, § 1; 1975, ch. 330, § 1; 1975, ch. 331, § 1; 1977, ch. 327, § 4; 1977, ch. 328, § 2; 1977, ch. 336, § 1; 1977, ch. 337, § 1; 1979, ch. 409, § 4; 1979, ch. 411, § 1; 1979, ch. 412, § 1; 1979, ch. 413, § 1; 1979, ch. 414, § 1; 1981, ch. 383, § 2; 1983, ch. 422, § 2; 1983, ch. 426, § 1; 1983, ch. 427, § 1; 1987, ch. 18, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 453, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 455, § 1; 1991, ch. 404, § 1; 1997, ch. 51, §§ 29, 30; 1999, ch. 12, § 9; 1999, ch. 335, § 1; 1999, ch. 336, § 1; 2001, ch. 331, § 2; 2003, ch. 12, § 5; 2005, ch. 40, § 10; 2009, ch. 40, § 17; 2009, ch. 322, § 8; 2009, ch. 326, § 1; 2011, ch. 267, § 5; 2019, ch. 309, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 13, S.L. 1995, provides:

“

Law Enforcement Training Academy Fee — Collection.

In addition to any other registration fee, a law enforcement training academy fee of two dollars is imposed on a passenger motor vehicle, a house car, and a truck weighing twelve thousand pounds or under that is subject to registration under title 39. The fee is payable when the registration under title 39 is payable. Each month the director of the department of transportation shall transfer to the highway fund the law enforcement training academy fees collected in accordance with this Act.”

Cross-References.

Motorcycle safety education fee in addition to registration fee, see § 39-28-01.

Collateral References.

Applicability of motor vehicle registration laws to corporation domiciled in state but having branch trucking bases in other states, 16 A.L.R.2d 1414.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 309, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

An owner of a semitrailer or farm trailer newly registered after August 1, 2019, shall pay the fees provided in section 3 of this Act. The owner of a currently registered semitrailer or farm trailer on August 1, 2019, shall renew registration and pay the fees provided in section 3 of this Act before January 1, 2020. The owner of a semitrailer or farm trailer currently registered under subsection 2 of section 39-04-12 as of August 1, 2019, shall renew registration and pay the fees provided in section 3 of this Act before January 1, 2020. That owner is entitled to receive a reduction in the fee of previously paid unused registration fees, except for fees paid for the 2019 registration year.”

39-04-19.1.
Registration of soil and water conservation vehicles.

Trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers owned and operated by a bona fide resident of this state, but no more than one truck tractor and lowboy trailer unit, of a gross weight of twenty-four thousand one pounds [10886.67 kilograms] or more and used exclusively in soil and water conservation work or exclusively for township road construction work that results in direct benefits to agriculture, shall be furnished license plates upon the payment of one-half the annual fees for such corresponding weight as provided in subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 39-04-19.

This section is not applicable to any trucks and trailers used in road construction work, the contract for which is in excess of three thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 535, § 1.

39-04-19.2.
Electric and plug-in hybrid vehicle road use fee — Definitions.

In addition to all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle, the department shall collect at the beginning of each annual registration period:

An electric vehicle road use fee of one hundred twenty dollars for each electric vehicle registered.

A plug-in hybrid vehicle road use fee of fifty dollars for each plug-in hybrid vehicle registered.

An electric motorcycle road use fee of twenty dollars for each electric motorcycle registered.

As used in this section:

“Electric motorcycle” means a motor vehicle that has a seat or saddle for the use of the rider, is designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, and is propelled by an electric motor powered by a battery or other electric device incorporated into the vehicle and not propelled by an engine powered by the combustion of a hydrocarbon fuel, including gasoline, diesel, propane, or liquid natural gas.

“Electric vehicle” means a vehicle propelled by an electric motor powered by a battery or other electric device incorporated into the vehicle and not propelled by an engine powered by the combustion of a hydrocarbon fuel, including gasoline, diesel, propane, or liquid natural gas.

“Plug-in hybrid vehicle” means a vehicle drawing propulsion energy from an internal combustion engine, an energy storage device, and a receptacle to accept grid electricity.

The department shall deposit any moneys collected under this section into the highway tax distribution fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 311, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

39-04-20.
Additional fees required of trucks. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 450, § 1.

39-04-21.
Fees for motor vehicles first registered in state.

When a motor vehicle first becomes subject to registration during the calendar year, the registration fee must be for the remainder of the year prorated on a monthly basis, one-twelfth of the annual registration fee for each calendar month or fraction thereof. Penny adjustments must be carried to the next even dollar. Temporary registrations must be issued in such manner as is prescribed by the director of the department of transportation.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. a; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. a; 1941, ch. 194, § 2, subs. b3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0440; S.L. 1953, ch. 238, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0440; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1971, ch. 357, § 3.

39-04-21.1.
Trailers, semitrailers, farm trailers — Registration fees prorated — Excess weight registration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 427, § 3.

39-04-22.
Motor vehicle exceeding registered gross weight for which licensed not to be operated on highway — Exception.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a motor vehicle, or a combination of motor vehicles, may not be operated upon the highways of this state when the gross weight exceeds the registered gross weight for which the vehicle or combination of vehicles was licensed. Any person violating the provisions of this section will be required to license such motor vehicle at the higher legal rate in accordance with the weight carried by the motor vehicle at the time of the violation for the entire license period. However, such registration may not be construed to authorize the movement of loads in violation of chapter 39-12.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. b; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. b; 1933, ch. 161, § 1, subs. b; 1941, ch. 194, § 2, subs. b5; R.C. 1943, § 39-0442; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1961, ch. 256, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 9.

39-04-23.
Registered motor vehicle transporting property may change registration to higher or lower registered gross weight.

Any owner of a motor vehicle transporting property who has licensed the vehicle for any gross weight limitations may change the registration to a higher registered gross weight limitation by the payment of the difference between the fee required for the new registration and the fee paid for the registration under which the vehicle is being operated. The fee must equal one-twelfth of the annual higher registration fee less one-twelfth of the registration fee already paid, the difference multiplied by the number of whole and partial calendar months remaining in the registration period. In no event may the fee be less than five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. b; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. b; 1933, ch. 161, § 1, subs. b; 1941, ch. 194, § 2, subs. b8; R.C. 1943, § 39-0444; S.L. 1951, ch. 244, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 39-0444; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 272, § 1; 1979, ch. 413, § 2; 1983, ch. 423, § 2; 2009, ch. 322, § 10.

39-04-24.
Director to determine weight of motor vehicle when manufacturer’s weight unknown.

Any motor vehicle not having an advertised manufacturer’s weight shall pay a license fee based upon the actual weight as determined by the director from satisfactory proofs submitted to the director. Any truck not having a manufacturer’s advertised load capacity shall pay a license fee in accordance with the schedules provided in this chapter and applicable thereto upon its load capacity as determined by the director upon satisfactory proofs submitted to the director.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. c; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. c; 1933, ch. 160, § 8; 1935, ch. 180, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0450; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1983, ch. 422, § 3.

39-04-25.
When seasonal registration of passenger buses permitted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 423, § 2.

39-04-26.
Registration of vehicles transporting property — Based on registered gross weight — Minimum gross weight — Exemption.

The registration and license fee for a motor vehicle or for any lawful combination of motor vehicles used for the transportation of property must be based upon the registered gross weight of the motor vehicle or combination of vehicles. The minimum gross weight for which the motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles can be licensed is double the unloaded weight of the motor vehicle or combination of vehicles and, subject to the minimum, the owner of any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles in the application for license shall set out the gross weight for which the owner desires a license. The gross weight of any trailer, semitrailer, or farm trailer may not be included in the minimum gross weight for which a vehicle must be licensed when the vehicle or combination of vehicles is not for hire and when the gross weight of the trailer, semitrailer, or farm trailer being towed does not exceed twenty-four thousand pounds [10886.22 kilograms].

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. b; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. b; 1933, ch. 161, § 1, subs. b; 1941, ch. 194, § 2, subs. b4; R.C. 1943, § 39-0454; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1961, ch. 256, § 2; 1977, ch. 327, § 5; 1979, ch. 409, § 5; 2009, ch. 322, § 11.

39-04-27.
Manufacturer or dealer to give notice of sale or transfer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 328, § 1.

39-04-28.
Motor vehicle and motorcycle dealers licenses — Fees — Additional number plates. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

Note.

For present provisions relating to motor vehicle dealer licensing, see chs. 39-22, 39-22.1 and 39-22.3

39-04-29.
Certificate of title to be delivered. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 38.

39-04-30.
Cancellation of licenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-31.
Bond required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-31.1.
Imposing fees in lieu of truck-mile tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15.

39-04-32.
Used car lots — Location. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-33.
Dealer permitting license to be used by another dealer — License revoked — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-34.
Dealers to furnish information to registrar. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-34.1.
Transfer of certain powers to public service commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 237, § 7.

39-04-35.
Dealer to file list of used cars with registrar — Fees paid on used cars by dealer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 285, § 14.

39-04-36.
Transfer of registered vehicle — Removal of number plates — Transfer of number plates.

Whenever the ownership of a vehicle registered under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 39-18, or chapter 39-29.2 is transferred or assigned, the registration of the vehicle expires and the transferor shall remove the number plates.

Upon applying for the transfer of the registration and paying a five dollar fee, a person who transfers or assigns to another person the ownership of a registered vehicle may receive credit for the unused portion of the fees paid for the transferred vehicle. The transferor must use a number plate previously removed pursuant to subsection 1, regardless of whether there is any license fee credit remaining. If the number plate has become lost, stolen, or mutilated, the transferor may apply for duplicate plates. The department may establish procedures that permit the transferor to assign the credit to the transferee if the transferor is the spouse, a sibling, or a lineal ancestor or descendant of the transferee. Any remaining credit on a vehicle owned by a leasing company must be credited to the lessee. One-twelfth of the annual fee must be credited for each month of the registration period remaining after the month in which the transfer is made. The credit may not extend beyond the original expiration of the registration. Except as provided in section 39-04-44, the credit must be applied to the registration fees for a replacement vehicle. The transferor shall apply for the transfer of registration within thirty days of the purchase of the replacement vehicle.

Except as otherwise permitted in this chapter, before the transferee of a registered vehicle may operate the vehicle on a highway, the transferee must apply for and obtain a new registration of the vehicle, as on an original registration. To provide the transferee adequate time to obtain a new registration, the director may provide for the issuance of a temporary registration certificate to permit the transferee to operate the vehicle for thirty days after the date of acquisition. The certificate must be printed on the reverse side of each vehicle registration card and must be available to the transferee from licensed vehicle dealers, law enforcement agencies, and motor vehicle branch offices. The vehicle may be operated for five days from date of purchase without a plate or certificate of ownership if dated evidence of ownership is carried in the vehicle. The evidence of ownership must be in a form as prescribed by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 16, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 39-0463; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 273, § 1; 1965, ch. 272, § 1; 1967, ch. 302, § 1; 1977, ch. 338, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 18; 1989, ch. 453, § 2; 1991, ch. 405, § 1; 1995, ch. 367, § 2; 1999, ch. 330, § 3; 2001, ch. 331, § 3; 2001, ch. 336, § 1; 2015, ch. 276, § 4, effective April 20, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

39-04-37.
Violations of registration provisions.

It is unlawful for any person to commit any of the following acts:

To operate, or for the owner thereof knowingly to permit anyone to operate, upon a highway any vehicle the registration of which has been canceled or revoked, or for which the registration fees required in this title have not been paid, or which does not have attached thereto and displayed thereon a number plate, plates, or validation tabs assigned thereto by the director for the current registration period, subject to the exemptions allowed in this title.

To display or cause or permit to be displayed, or to have in possession, any registration card, registration number plate, or validation tabs knowing the same to be fictitious or to have been canceled, revoked, suspended, or altered.

To lend any registration number plate, registration card, or validation tabs to any person not entitled thereto, or knowingly permit the use of any registration number plate or registration card by any person not entitled thereto.

To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon demand, any registration card, registration number plate, or validation tab which has been suspended, canceled, or revoked as is provided in this chapter.

To use a false or fictitious name or address in any application for the registration of any vehicle, or for any renewal or duplicate thereof, or knowingly to make a false statement or knowingly to conceal a material fact or otherwise to commit a fraud in any application.

To operate, or for the owner thereof knowingly to permit anyone to operate a motor vehicle on a highway if the owner is employed in this state on a temporary or full-time basis, is a resident of the state, and does not have a temporary registration permit when required under subsection 1 of section 39-04-18.2. As used in this subsection, the term “resident” means a resident as defined under subdivision e of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 24; 1933, ch. 160, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 39-0465; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1981, ch. 378, § 19; 1983, ch. 416, § 4; 1985, ch. 425, § 1; 1989, ch. 456, § 1; 2021, ch. 283, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense for the operator of a motor vehicle not to carry or display his operator’s license or the vehicle registration certificate, 6 A.L.R.3d 506.

Validity and construction of statute making it a criminal offense to tamper with motor vehicle or contents, or to obscure registration plates, 57 A.L.R.3d 606.

39-04-38.
Taxes or fees provided for to be in lieu of other state or local personal property taxes.

The taxes or fees provided for in this chapter are in lieu of all other personal property taxes, either state or local, upon such motor vehicles and upon any trailer or semitrailer for which a certificate of title is required to be issued and has been issued pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39-05.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 25, subs. h; 1931, ch. 186, § 5, subs. h; R.C. 1943, § 39-0466; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 405, § 5.

39-04-39.
Distribution of registration fees collected.

Any moneys in the registration fund accruing from license fees or from other like sources, in excess of the amount required to pay salaries and other necessary expenses, in accordance with the legislative assembly’s appropriation for such purposes, must be promptly deposited in the highway tax distribution fund which must be distributed in the manner as prescribed by law. The state treasurer shall transfer annually from the highway tax distribution fund to the ethanol production incentive fund an amount equal to forty percent of all sums collected for the registration of farm vehicles under subsection 5 of section 39-04-19 except that no transfer may be made in an amount that would result in the balance of the ethanol production incentive fund exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 30; 1933, ch. 160, § 11; 1935, ch. 177, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0467; S.L. 1955, ch. 244, § 5; 1957, ch. 259, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0467; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1961, ch. 255, § 2; 1963, ch. 274, § 1; 1967, ch. 304, § 2; 1993, ch. 380, § 1; 2003, ch. 57, § 6; 2007, ch. 496, § 6.

Cross-References.

Highway tax distribution fund, see § 54-27-19.

39-04-39.1.
Distribution to local highway funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1967, ch. 304, § 8.

39-04-39.2.
Refunds of registration fees.

No refunds of registration fees may be made, except when the vehicle has been improperly registered or when the vehicle has been destroyed.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 28, § 4; 1995, ch. 367, § 3.

39-04-39.3.
Motor vehicle registration fee collection agreements with home rule cities.

The governing body of any incorporated city that has adopted the home rule provisions of chapter 40-05.1 and the department may enter into contractual agreements under which the department may collect any motor vehicle registration fees assessed by the city. Agreements entered into under this section must provide for an agreed-upon amount to be allowed the department for services rendered in connection with the collections. Any agreed-upon amount collected must be deposited in the motor vehicle registration fund. The department shall deposit with the state treasurer all money collected under this section and shall accompany each remittance with a certificate showing the city for which it was collected. The state treasurer, quarterly, shall pay to the city auditors of the several cities the money to which they are entitled under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 428, § 1; 2009, ch. 326, § 2.

39-04-39.4.
Refund of registration fees.

Any owner of a motor vehicle, if such motor vehicle is returned to the manufacturer under the provisions of chapter 51-07, may claim a refund in the amount equal to the unused portion of the fee upon the vehicle, computed pro rata by the month, one-twelfth of the annual fee paid for each month of the registration period remaining after the month in which the vehicle was returned, provided the number plates and validation tabs issued for the vehicle are returned to the department.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 424, § 1.

39-04-39.5.
Allocation of portion of registration fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 40, § 15.

39-04-40.
Officers to enforce the provisions of chapter.

The highway patrol and all other road or police officers shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 35; R.C. 1943, § 39-0468; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1983, ch. 418, § 4.

39-04-41.
Penalty for violation of provisions of chapter.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter for which another penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 37, subss. a, b; 1931, ch. 186, § 8, subss. a, b; 1933, ch. 162, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 39-0469; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1975, ch. 106, § 423.

39-04-42.
Construction contract truck registration — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

39-04-43.
Antique automobile — License and fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 38.

39-04-44.
Credits on destroyed vehicle.

Any owner of a motor vehicle licensed in this state, if such vehicle is permanently and involuntarily destroyed, may during the same year or following year claim a refund in an amount equal to the unused portion of the fee paid, less five dollars, upon the vehicle so destroyed, computed pro rata by the month, one-twelfth of the annual fee paid for each month of the year remaining after the month in which such vehicle was so destroyed, provided the number plates, registration card, and certificate of title are returned to the department. If the number plates or registration card assigned to the vehicle are destroyed, a refund may be obtained upon furnishing information of such fact satisfactory to the department. Upon receiving the certificate of title, the department shall issue a salvage certificate of title.

If a vehicle is withdrawn from a proportionally registered fleet during the period for which it is registered, the registrant of the fleet shall notify the department. The department may require surrender of cab cards and other identification devices with respect to the vehicle. If a vehicle is permanently withdrawn from a proportionally registered fleet because it has been destroyed, sold, or otherwise completely removed from the service of the fleet operator, the unused portion of the fees paid with respect to the vehicle must be applied against liability of the fleet operator for subsequent additions to the fleet during the registration year or for additional fees upon audit. If at the end of the registration year there remains an unused portion of fees paid with respect to the permanently withdrawn vehicles, the unused fees must be applied against registration fees for the registration year immediately following the year during which the vehicles were permanently withdrawn. The used portion of fees of a vehicle permanently withdrawn from a fleet is a sum equal to the amount paid with respect to the vehicle when it was first proportionally registered in the registration year, reduced by one-twelfth of the total annual proportional registration fee applicable to the vehicle for each calendar month of the registration year including the month the notice of withdrawal is received by the department, except that no unused portion of fees of less than five dollars may be considered or applied. If an unused portion of fees cannot be applied against registration fees for the registration year immediately following, an application for refund of the unused portion may be made to the department, which shall adopt rules as may be required for payment of the refund.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 245, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0472; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1967, ch. 303, § 1; 1971, ch. 362, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 20; 1995, ch. 367, § 4; 1995, ch. 369, § 1.

39-04-44.1.
Transporter’s license and registration card.

A vehicle otherwise properly registered may be used for transporting other vehicles not registered provided that the transported vehicle has displayed a transporter’s license plate and the transporting vehicle carries a transporter’s registration card. The fee for the transporter’s license plate and registration card is sixty-five dollars per year.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 6; 1987, ch. 454, § 1.

39-04-45.
Driveaway transporter registration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-46.
Driveaway transporter registration — Expiration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-47.
Driveaway transporter registration — Display. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-48.
Driveaway transporter registration — Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-49.
Driveaway transporter registration — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-50.
Motor vehicle department powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-51.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-52.
Driveaway transport license fees — Effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-53.
Noncompliance — Effect. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 265, § 7.

39-04-54.
Registration card — Issuance — Contents — Signing.

Upon registering a vehicle, the department shall issue to the owner a registration card which must set forth all of the following:

The date issued.

The registration number assigned to the vehicle.

A description of the registered vehicle, including either serial or identification number.

A space for the signature of the owner.

The name of the owner.

Other statements of fact as may be determined necessary by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 295, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 21.

39-04-55.
Registration card to be carried in or on vehicle — Inspection of card — Penalty.

The registration card issued for a vehicle must be carried in the driver’s compartment of the vehicle or, in the case of a housetrailer or mobile home or a trailer or semitrailer, regardless of when such vehicle was acquired, inside or on the vehicle, at all times while the vehicle is being operated upon a highway in this state. The card is subject to inspection by any peace officer or highway patrol officer. Any person violating this section must be assessed a fee of twenty dollars. However, a person cited for violation of this section may not be found to have committed the violation if the person, within fourteen days after being cited produces and displays to the office of the prosecutor where the matter is pending, a registration card valid at the time the person was cited. A peace officer or highway patrol officer, upon citing a person for violating this section, shall inform the person that a violation will be considered as not having occurred if the person produces and displays a valid registration card in the manner provided in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 295, § 1; 1973, ch. 301, § 17, amending former N.D.C.C. § 39-05-12; S.L. 1991, ch. 406, § 1; 2021, ch. 283, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 39-04-55 was created by section 1 of chapter 295, 1973 S.L. and section 2 of the same chapter 295 repealed section 39-05-12, which contained the provisions which comprised new section 39-04-55. The effect of the repeal and enactment was to remove the law from the chapter on title registration and to place it in the chapter on motor vehicle registration. Section 39-05-12 was amended by section 17 of chapter 301, 1973 S.L. and, since the identical provisions which were in section 39-05-12 were transferred to section 39-04-55, the amendment in chapter 301 has been harmonized with the latter section in order to give effect to both actions of the Legislative Assembly pursuant to section 1-02-09.1.

39-04-56.
Altering or forging registration card — Penalty.

It is a class C felony for any person to:

Alter with fraudulent intent any registration card issued by the department;

Forge or counterfeit any registration card purporting to have been issued by the department under the provisions of this chapter;

Alter or falsify with fraudulent intent or forge any assignment of a registration card; or

Use any registration card, or assignment, knowing the same to have been altered, forged, or falsified.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 6.